Utah statutes.
57-1-15.   Effect of recording assignment of mortgage.
The recording of an assignment of a mortgage is not in itself considered
notice of the assignment to the mortgagor, his heirs, or personal
representatives so as to invalidate any payment made by them or either of them
to the mortgagee.
